Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202482-101.04
Director of the Nebraska State Historical Society; restriction on other service.

The Director of the Nebraska State Historical Society shall not be a board member of or serve in an advisory capacity for any charitable organization that provides money or other support to the Nebraska State Historical Society.

Laws 2024, LB1169, § 11.
July 19, 2024